zh-CN: 雪茄主体: 全; 媒介; 中等至浓郁; 温和; 温和至中等; 其他
pt-PT: Corpo do charuto: Completo; Médio; Médio a full; Ameno; Mild a médio; Outro
vi: Độ đậm của xì gà: Toàn bộ; Vừa; Vừa đến đầy đủ; Dịu nhẹ; Nhẹ đến vừa; Khác
ja: シガーボディ: フル; 媒体; ミディアム～フル; マイルド; マイルド～ミディアム; その他
lt-LT: Cigaro intensyvumas: Stiprus; Vidutinis; Vidutinis-stiprus; Švelnus; Švelnus-vidutinis; Kita
de: Zigarrenkörper: Vollständig; Medium; Mittel bis voll; Leicht; Leicht bis mittel; Sonstiges
sv: Cigarrkropp: Full; Medium; Medium till full; Mild; Mild till medium; Övrigt
el: Ένταση πούρου: Γεμάτη; Μέση; Μέτριο προς γεμάτο; Ήπιο; Ήπιο προς μέτριο; Άλλο
en: Cigar body: Full; Medium; Medium to full; Mild; Mild to medium; Other
ru: Тело сигары: Полный; Средний; Средний или полный; Мягкий; Мягкий или средний; Другой
pt-BR: Corpo do charuto: Completa; Médio; Médio a cheio; Ameno; Leve a médio; Outro
zh-TW: 雪茄醇度: 全面的; 媒介; 飽滿至完整; 輕微; 輕度至中度; 其他
tr: Puro Gövdesi: Tam; Orta; Orta ila tam; Ilık; Hafif ila orta; Diğer
sk-SK: Telo cigary: Plný; Stredný; Stredný až plný; Mierny; Mierny až stredný; Iné
ko: 시가 바디: 전체; 매체; 미디엄 투 풀; 마일드; 마일드 투 미디엄; 기타
ro-RO: Corp trabuc: Cu gust bogat; Gust mediu; Gust mediu spre bogat; Gust ușor; Gust ușor spre mediu; Altele
sl-SI: Telo cigare: Polna; Srednja; Srednja do polna; Blaga; Blaga do srednja; Drugo
hu: Szivartest: Erős; Közepesen erős; Közepesen erős – erős; Enyhe; Enyhe – közepesen erős; Egyéb
fr: Corps du cigare: Complet; Moyen; Moyen à complet; Modéré; Doux à moyen; Autre
hr-HR: Aroma i jačina cigare: Puno; Srednje; Srednje do puno; Blago; Blago do srednje; Ostalo
nb: Sigarstyrke: Full; Middels; Middels til full; Mild; Mild til middels; Annet
th: ก้านซิการ์: ทั้งหมด; สื่อ; ปานกลางถึงแรง; อ่อน; อ่อนถึงปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
da: Cigarkrop: Fuldt; Medium; Medium til fuld; Mild; Mild til medium; Andet
pl: Korpus cygara: Pełna; Środek; Średnie do pełnego; Delikatny; Łagodne do średniego; Inne
cs: Síla doutníku: Plný; Médium; Středně plné až plné; Jemné; Jemné až středně plné; Jiné
it: Corpo del sigaro: Pieno; Medium; Da medio a pieno; Intensità lieve; Da lieve a media; Altro
fi: Sikarin vartalo: Täysi; Keskimääräinen; Keskivahvasta täyteläiseen; Lievä; Miedosta keskivahvaan; Muu
es: Fortaleza de cigarro: Total; Medio; Medio a lleno; Suave; De leve a medio; Otros
bg-BG: Основна част на пура: Пълна; Средна; Средна до пълна; Лека; Лека до средна; Други
nl: Sigaarbody: Volledig; Medium; Gemiddeld tot vol; Mild; Mild tot medium; Andere